Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.030

Lien creditors as parties defendant.

The plaintiff may, at his or her option, make creditors having a lien upon the property or any portion thereof, other than by a judgment or decree, defendants in the suit. When the lien is upon an undivided interest or estate of any of the parties, such lien, if a partition be made, is thenceforth a lien only on the share assigned to such party; but such share shall be first charged with its just proportion of the costs of the partition, in preference to such lien.

[ 2011 c 336 s 221; Code 1881 s 554; 1877 p 117 s 559; 1869 p 133 s 507; RRS s 840.]